Washington statutes.
RCW 43.92.090

Subsurface geologic information.

(1) The geological survey shall compile and maintain a comprehensive database of publicly available subsurface geologic information relating to Washington state. The geological survey must make the database available to the public in a searchable format via the geological survey's website.

(2) The subsurface geologic information contained on the website should include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Temperature gradient logs;

(b) Geothermal well records;

(c) High resolution magnetotelluric surveys;

(d) High resolution gravity surveys;

(e) Geothermal play fairway studies;

(f) Three-dimensional reflection seismic surveys; and

(g) Rock properties databases.

(3) The geological survey must:

(a) Coordinate with federal, state, and local agencies, and tribal governments, to compile existing subsurface geologic information;

(b) Acquire, process, and analyze new subsurface geologic data and update deficient data using the best practicable technology;

(c) Using available data, characterize the hazard of induced seismicity for high-potential geothermal play areas. Results of induced seismicity hazard studies must be made publicly available and updated as new information is available; and

(d) Provide technical assistance on the proper interpretation and application of subsurface geologic data and hazard assessments.

[ 2024 c 350 s 1.]